test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-norm.yaml
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [odaagimenyishiwaadig, odaagimenyishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret: odaagimensishiniiban
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [odaagimensishiniidig, odaagimensishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret: odaagimensishiwaaban
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [odaagimensishiwaadig, odaagimensishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nidaagimenyishinaaning
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nidaagimenyishinaanin
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nidaagimenyishinaanig
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nidaagimensishinaaning
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nidaagimensishinaanin
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nidaagimensishinaanig
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+21+Loc: gidaagimenyishinaaning
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+21+Obv: gidaagimenyishinaanin
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+21+Pl: gidaagimenyishinaanig
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gidaagimenyishiwaang
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gidaagimenyishiwaan
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gidaagimenyishiwaag
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+Loc: gidaagimensishinaaning
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+Obv: gidaagimensishinaanin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+Pl: gidaagimensishinaanig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gidaagimensishiwaang
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gidaagimensishiwaan
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gidaagimensishiwaag
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+Loc: odaagimenyishiniing
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+Obv: odaagimenyishiniin
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pl: odaagimenyishiniig
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+Loc: odaagimenyishiwaang
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+Obv: odaagimenyishiwaan
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pl: odaagimenyishiwaag
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Loc: odaagimensishiniing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Obv: odaagimensishiniin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pl: odaagimensishiniig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Loc: odaagimensishiwaang
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Obv: odaagimensishiwaan
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pl: odaagimensishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: nidaagimenyishibaniing
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: nidaagimenyishibaniin
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: nidaagimenyishibaniig
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: nidaagimensishibaniing
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: nidaagimensishibaniin
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: nidaagimensishibaniig
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: gidaagimenyishibaniing
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: gidaagimenyishibaniin
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: gidaagimenyishibaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensishibaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensishibaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensishibaniig
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyishibaniing
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyishibaniin
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyishibaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: odaagimensishibaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: odaagimensishibaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: odaagimensishibaniig
     X+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: idaagimenyishibaniing
     X+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: idaagimenyishibaniin
     X+aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: idaagimenyishibaniig
     X+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: idaagimensishibaniing
     X+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: idaagimensishibaniin
     X+aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: idaagimensishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Con+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagimenyinaanibaniing
     1+aagim+Con+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagimenyinaanibaniin
     1+aagim+Con+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagimenyinaanibaniig
     1+aagim+Con+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagimenyinaanidig, nidaagimenyinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Con+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagimenyinaanidig, nidaagimenyinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Con+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagimenyinaanidig, nidaagimenyinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagimensinaanibaniing
     1+aagim+Dim+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagimensinaanibaniin
     1+aagim+Dim+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagimensinaanibaniig
     1+aagim+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagimensinaanidig, nidaagimensinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagimensinaanidig, nidaagimensinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagimensinaanidig, nidaagimensinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimenyinaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Con+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimenyinaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Con+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimenyinaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Con+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimenyinaanidig, gidaagimenyinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimenyinaanidig, gidaagimenyinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimenyinaanidig, gidaagimenyinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimenyiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+Con+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimenyiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+Con+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimenyiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimenyiwaadig, gidaagimenyiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimenyiwaadig, gidaagimenyiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimenyiwaadig, gidaagimenyiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensinaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensinaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensinaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimensinaanidig, gidaagimensinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimensinaanidig, gidaagimensinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimensinaanidig, gidaagimensinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimensiwaadig, gidaagimensiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimensiwaadig, gidaagimensiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimensiwaadig, gidaagimensiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyiniibaniing
     3+aagim+Con+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyiniibaniin
     3+aagim+Con+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyiniibaniig
     3+aagim+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimenyiniidig, odaagimenyiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimenyiniidig, odaagimenyiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimenyiniidig, odaagimenyiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Con+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Con+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimenyiwaadig, odaagimenyiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimenyiwaadig, odaagimenyiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimenyiwaadig, odaagimenyiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimensiniibaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimensiniibaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimensiniibaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimensiniidig, odaagimensiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimensiniidig, odaagimensiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimensiniidig, odaagimensiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimensiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimensiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimensiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimensiwaadig, odaagimensiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimensiwaadig, odaagimensiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimensiwaadig, odaagimensiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nidaagimimishinaaniban
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaagimimishinaanidig, nidaagimimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gidaagimimishinaaniban
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gidaagimimishinaanidig, gidaagimimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gidaagimimishiwaaban
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaagimimishiwaadig, gidaagimimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: odaagimimishiniiban
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [odaagimimishiniidig, odaagimimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: odaagimimishiwaaban
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [odaagimimishiwaadig, odaagimimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nidaagimimishinaaning
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nidaagimimishinaanin
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nidaagimimishinaanig
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gidaagimimishinaaning
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gidaagimimishinaanin
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gidaagimimishinaanig
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gidaagimimishiwaang
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gidaagimimishiwaan
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gidaagimimishiwaag
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: odaagimimishiniing
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: odaagimimishiniin
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: odaagimimishiniig
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: odaagimimishiwaang
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: odaagimimishiwaan
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: odaagimimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nidaagimimishibaniing
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nidaagimimishibaniin
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nidaagimimishibaniig
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gidaagimimishibaniing
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gidaagimimishibaniin
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gidaagimimishibaniig
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: odaagimimishibaniing
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: odaagimimishibaniin
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: odaagimimishibaniig
     X+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: idaagimimishibaniing
     X+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: idaagimimishibaniin
     X+aagim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: idaagimimishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagimiminaanibaniing
     1+aagim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagimiminaanibaniin
     1+aagim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagimiminaanibaniig
     1+aagim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagimiminaanidig, nidaagimiminaanidog]
     1+aagim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagimiminaanidig, nidaagimiminaanidog]
     1+aagim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagimiminaanidig, nidaagimiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimiminaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimiminaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimiminaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimiminaanidig, gidaagimiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimiminaanidig, gidaagimiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimiminaanidig, gidaagimiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimimiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimimiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimimiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimimiwaadig, gidaagimimiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimimiwaadig, gidaagimimiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimimiwaadig, gidaagimimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimiminiibaniing
     3+aagim+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimiminiibaniin
     3+aagim+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimiminiibaniig
     3+aagim+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimiminiidig, odaagimiminiidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimiminiidig, odaagimiminiidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimiminiidig, odaagimiminiidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimimiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimimiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimimiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimimiwaadig, odaagimimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimimiwaadig, odaagimimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimimiwaadig, odaagimimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagimishinaanibaniing
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagimishinaanibaniin
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagimishinaanibaniig
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagimishinaanidig, nidaagimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagimishinaanidig, nidaagimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagimishinaanidig, nidaagimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimishinaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimishinaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimishinaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimishinaanidig, gidaagimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimishinaanidig, gidaagimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimishinaanidig, gidaagimishinaanidog]
